Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER; PAPERWORK REDUCTION FOR CHILD PROTECTION CASES.new text end new text begin By January 15, 2026, the commissioner of children, youth, and families in partnership with counties and local social services agencies, and in consultation with Minnesota's Tribal governments, shall develop a plan to streamline and minimize required paperwork for child protection cases. The plan must include a summary of proposed changes to current practice, a proposed timeline to implement the changes, and procedures for soliciting ongoing input regarding implementation from counties and Minnesota's Tribal governments. The procedures for soliciting ongoing input must include a method of incorporating the input into the implementation of the changes and ensuring that the planned improvements maximize benefits and utility for children in placement, foster care providers, Tribes, counties, and private child placing agencies. new text end